Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5124.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) The commission's authority to administer this act is limited to the powers and duties explicitly provided for under this act, and the commission shall does not have the authority to regulate or control a provider under this act as a public utility. (2) The commission shall file a report with the governor and legislature by February April 1 of each year that shall include includes information on the status of competition for video services in this state and recommendations for any needed legislation. (3) A video service provider shall submit to the commission any information requested by the commission necessary for the preparation of the annual report required under this subsection (2). The obligation of a video service provider under this subsection is limited to the submission of information generated or gathered in the normal course of business. (4) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, or within 30 days after offering a video service in this state, whichever is later, a video service provider must submit to the commission all of the following information: (a) The name of the provider. (b) A description of the video services provided by the provider. (c) The address and telephone number of the provider's principal office. (d) The address and telephone number of the provider's registered agent authorized to receive service of process in this state. (e) Any other information the commission determines is necessary to administer this act. (5) If a video service provider changes the provider's name, goes out of business, or merges with another person, the provider shall notify the commission not less than 30 days before the effective date of the name change, closure, or merger.